Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-152
Banks; loans on real estate; authorized.

A bank may make loans secured by real estate or may participate with other financial institutions in such loans whether such participation occurs at the inception of the loan or at any time after the loan was made.

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 52, p. 156;

Laws 1965, c. 28, § 4, p. 202;

Laws 1972, LB 1226, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 164, § 16;

Laws 1974, LB 845, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 220, § 6;

Laws 1982, LB 779, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 979, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 53.